Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/mn_affix.dat
SET UTF-8
TRY агэлдйхүуниросчтөцмвбшзжыяекьпфёъюБКМАСГЛДХПТФНВРЭОУШИЧЖЦЗЯЮӨЕЙҮЁЬЪщЩ

SFX A Y 84
SFX A 0 чихлаа .
SFX A 0 чихвал .
SFX A 0 чихлаар .
SFX A 0 чихсаны .
SFX A 0 чихсанд .
SFX A 0 чихмагц .
SFX A 0 чихмаар .
SFX A 0 чихдагт .
SFX A 0 чихсаных .
SFX A 0 чихсаныг .
SFX A 0 чихсанаа .
SFX A 0 чихдагаа .
SFX A 0 чихтайгаа .
SFX A 0 чихлаараа .
SFX A 0 чихсантай .
SFX A 0 чихсандаа .
SFX A 0 чихсангүй .
SFX A 0 чихсанаас .
SFX A 0 чихсанаар .
SFX A 0 чихмагцаа .
SFX A 0 чихдагтай .
SFX A 0 чихдагтаа .
SFX A 0 чихдагийн .
SFX A 0 чихдагийг .
SFX A 0 чихдаггүй .
SFX A 0 чихдагаас .
SFX A 0 чихдагаар .
SFX A 0 чихсаныхаа .
SFX A 0 чихсаныгаа .
SFX A 0 чихмааргүй .
SFX A 0 чихдагийнх .
SFX A 0 чихсантайгаа .
SFX A 0 чихсанаасаа .
SFX A 0 чихсанаараа .
SFX A 0 чихдагтайгаа .
SFX A 0 чихдагийнхаа .
SFX A 0 чихдагийгаа .
SFX A 0 чихдагаасаа .
SFX A 0 чихдагаараа .
SFX A 0 чихсангүйн .
SFX A 0 чихсангүйд .
SFX A 0 чихсангүйг .
SFX A 0 чихдаггүйн .
SFX A 0 чихдаггүйд .
SFX A 0 чихдаггүйг .
SFX A 0 чихсангүйтэй .
SFX A 0 чихсангүйгээс .
SFX A 0 чихсангүйгээр .
SFX A 0 чихсангүйгээ .
SFX A 0 чихдаггүйтэй .
SFX A 0 чихдаггүйгээс .
SFX A 0 чихдаггүйгээр .
SFX A 0 чихдаггүйгээ .
SFX A 0 чхын .
SFX A 0 чхыг .
SFX A 0 чхынх .
SFX A 0 чхан .
SFX A 0 чхаж .
SFX A 0 чхад .
SFX A 0 чхаг .
SFX A 0 чхав .
SFX A 0 чхаа .
SFX A 0 чхавч .
SFX A 0 чхаач .
SFX A 0 чхаас .
SFX A 0 чхаар .
SFX A 0 чхаад .
SFX A 0 чхыгаа .
SFX A 0 чхангаа .
SFX A 0 чхаасай .
SFX A 0 чхаасаа .
SFX A 0 чхаарай .
SFX A 0 чхаараа .
SFX A 0 чхаагүй .
SFX A 0 чхынхаа .
SFX A 0 чхангуут .
SFX A 0 чхаагүйн .
SFX A 0 чхаагүйд .
SFX A 0 чхаагүйг .
SFX A 0 чхангуутаа .
SFX A 0 чхаагүйтэй .
SFX A 0 чхаагүйгээ .
SFX A 0 чхаагүйгээс .
SFX A 0 чхаагүйгээр .

SFX B Y 107
SFX B 0 уул .
SFX B 0 уулаа .
SFX B 0 уулъя .
SFX B 0 уултал .
SFX B 0 уулсан .
SFX B 0 ууллаа .
SFX B 0 уулжээ .
SFX B 0 уулж .
SFX B 0 уулдаг .
SFX B 0 уулах .
SFX B 0 уулан .
SFX B 0 уулагч .
SFX B 0 уулаг .
SFX B 0 уулавч .
SFX B 0 уулав .
SFX B 0 уулаач .
SFX B 0 уулаад .
SFX B 0 уулсны .
SFX B 0 уулна .
SFX B 0 уулбал .
SFX B 0 уулсанд .
SFX B 0 уулсаар .
SFX B 0 уулмагц .
SFX B 0 уулмаар .
SFX B 0 уулдагт .
SFX B 0 уулахын .
SFX B 0 уулахыг .
SFX B 0 уулахад .
SFX B 0 уулахаа .
SFX B 0 уултлаа .
SFX B 0 уулсных .
SFX B 0 уулсныг .
SFX B 0 уулснаа .
SFX B 0 уулдгаа .
SFX B 0 уулахынх .
SFX B 0 уулахтай .
SFX B 0 уулахдаа .
SFX B 0 уулахгүй .
SFX B 0 уулахаас .
SFX B 0 уулахаар .
SFX B 0 уулангаа .
SFX B 0 уулагчид .
SFX B 0 уулагчаа .
SFX B 0 уулаасай .
SFX B 0 уулаарай .
SFX B 0 уулаагүй .
SFX B 0 уулснаас .
SFX B 0 уулснаар .
SFX B 0 уулдгийн .
SFX B 0 уулдгийг .
SFX B 0 уулдгаас .
SFX B 0 уулдгаар .
SFX B 0 уулсантай .
SFX B 0 уулсандаа .
SFX B 0 уулсангүй .
SFX B 0 уулмагцаа .
SFX B 0 уулдагтай .
SFX B 0 уулдагтаа .
SFX B 0 уулдаггүй .
SFX B 0 уулахыгаа .
SFX B 0 уулахлаар .
SFX B 0 уулангуут .
SFX B 0 уулагчтай .
SFX B 0 уулагчийн .
SFX B 0 уулагчийг .
SFX B 0 уулагчдын .
SFX B 0 уулагчдыг .
SFX B 0 уулагчдад .
SFX B 0 уулагчдаа .
SFX B 0 уулагчгүй .
SFX B 0 уулагчаас .
SFX B 0 уулагчаар .
SFX B 0 уулсныхаа .
SFX B 0 уулсныгаа .
SFX B 0 уулдгийнх .
SFX B 0 уулмааргүй .
SFX B 0 уулахынхаа .
SFX B 0 уулахаасаа .
SFX B 0 уулахаараа .
SFX B 0 уулагчийнх .
SFX B 0 уулагчдынх .
SFX B 0 уулагчдаас .
SFX B 0 уулагчдаар .
SFX B 0 уулснаасаа .
SFX B 0 уулснаараа .
SFX B 0 уулдгийгаа .
SFX B 0 уулдгаасаа .
SFX B 0 уулдгаараа .
SFX B 0 уулсантайгаа .
SFX B 0 уулдагтайгаа .
SFX B 0 уулахтайгаа .
SFX B 0 уулахлаараа .
SFX B 0 уулангуутаа .
SFX B 0 уулагчтайгаа .
SFX B 0 уулагчийнхаа .
SFX B 0 уулагчийгаа .
SFX B 0 уулагчидтай .
SFX B 0 уулагчидгүй .
SFX B 0 уулагчдынхаа .
SFX B 0 уулагчдыгаа .
SFX B 0 уулагчдадаа .
SFX B 0 уулагчдаасаа .
SFX B 0 уулагчдаараа .
SFX B 0 уулагчаасаа .
SFX B 0 уулагчаараа .
SFX B 0 уулдгийнхаа .
SFX B 0 уулагчидтайгаа .

SFX C Y 144
SFX C 0 чихсансан .
SFX C 0 чхалгүй .
SFX C 0 чхалгүйгээ .
SFX C 0 чхалгүйгээр .
SFX C 0 цгаа .
SFX C 0 цгаая .
SFX C 0 цгаах .
SFX C 0 цгаан .
SFX C 0 цгааж .
SFX C 0 цгааг .
SFX C 0 цгаав .
SFX C 0 цгаана .
SFX C 0 цгаагч .
SFX C 0 цгаавч .
SFX C 0 цгаахын .
SFX C 0 цгаахыг .
SFX C 0 цгаахад .
SFX C 0 цгаахаа .
SFX C 0 цгаатал .
SFX C 0 цгаасны .
SFX C 0 цгаасан .
SFX C 0 цгаалаа .
SFX C 0 цгаажээ .
SFX C 0 цгаадаг .
SFX C 0 цгаагаа .
SFX C 0 цгаавал .
SFX C 0 цгаахынх .
SFX C 0 цгаахтай .
SFX C 0 цгаахдаа .
SFX C 0 цгаахгүй .
SFX C 0 цгаахаас .
SFX C 0 цгаахаар .
SFX C 0 цгаатлаа .
SFX C 0 цгаасных .
SFX C 0 цгаасныг .
SFX C 0 цгааснаа .
SFX C 0 цгаасанд .
SFX C 0 цгаасаар .
SFX C 0 цгаангаа .
SFX C 0 цгаамагц .
SFX C 0 цгаамаар .
SFX C 0 цгаадгаа .
SFX C 0 цгаадагт .
SFX C 0 цгаагчид .
SFX C 0 цгаагчаа .
SFX C 0 цгаагаач .
SFX C 0 цгаагаад .
SFX C 0 цгаахыгаа .
SFX C 0 цгаахлаар .
SFX C 0 цгааснаас .
SFX C 0 цгааснаар .
SFX C 0 цгаангуут .
SFX C 0 цгаадгийн .
SFX C 0 цгаадгийг .
SFX C 0 цгаадгаас .
SFX C 0 цгаадгаар .
SFX C 0 цгаагчтай .
SFX C 0 цгаагчийн .
SFX C 0 цгаагчийг .
SFX C 0 цгаагчдын .
SFX C 0 цгаагчдыг .
SFX C 0 цгаагчдад .
SFX C 0 цгаагчдаа .
SFX C 0 цгаагчгүй .
SFX C 0 цгаагчаас .
SFX C 0 цгаагчаар .
SFX C 0 цгаахынхаа .
SFX C 0 цгаахгүйн .
SFX C 0 цгаахаасаа .
SFX C 0 цгаахаараа .
SFX C 0 цгаасныхаа .
SFX C 0 цгаасныгаа .
SFX C 0 цгаасантай .
SFX C 0 цгаасандаа .
SFX C 0 цгаасангүй .
SFX C 0 цгаамагцаа .
SFX C 0 цгаадгийнх .
SFX C 0 цгаадагтай .
SFX C 0 цгаадагтаа .
SFX C 0 цгаадаггүй .
SFX C 0 цгаагчийнх .
SFX C 0 цгаагчдынх .
SFX C 0 цгаагчдаас .
SFX C 0 цгаагчдаар .
SFX C 0 цгаагуузай .
SFX C 0 цгаагаасай .
SFX C 0 цгаагаарай .
SFX C 0 цгаагаагүй .
SFX C 0 цгаахгүйд .
SFX C 0 цгаахгүйг .
SFX C 0 цгаахтайгаа .
SFX C 0 цгаахлаараа .
SFX C 0 цгааснаасаа .
SFX C 0 цгааснаараа .
SFX C 0 цгаасантайгаа .
SFX C 0 цгаангуутаа .
SFX C 0 цгаамааргүй .
SFX C 0 цгаадгийнхаа .
SFX C 0 цгаадгийгаа .
SFX C 0 цгаадгаасаа .
SFX C 0 цгаадгаараа .
SFX C 0 цгаадагтайгаа .
SFX C 0 цгаагчтайгаа .
SFX C 0 цгаагчийнхаа .
SFX C 0 цгаагчийгаа .
SFX C 0 цгаагчидтайгаа .
SFX C 0 цгаагчидтай .
SFX C 0 цгаагчидгүй .
SFX C 0 цгаагчдынхаа .
SFX C 0 цгаагчдыгаа .
SFX C 0 цгаагчдадаа .
SFX C 0 цгаагчдаасаа .
SFX C 0 цгаагчдаараа .
SFX C 0 цгаагчаасаа .
SFX C 0 цгаагчаараа .
SFX C 0 цгаахгүйтэй .
SFX C 0 цгаахгүйгээс .
SFX C 0 цгаахгүйгээр .
SFX C 0 цгаахгүйгээ .
SFX C 0 цгаасангүйтэй .
SFX C 0 цгаасангүйн .
SFX C 0 цгаасангүйд .
SFX C 0 цгаасангүйгээс .
SFX C 0 цгаасангүйгээр .
SFX C 0 цгаасангүйгээ .
SFX C 0 цгаасангүйг .
SFX C 0 цгаадаггүйтэй .
SFX C 0 цгаадаггүйн .
SFX C 0 цгаадаггүйд .
SFX C 0 цгаадаггүйгээс .
SFX C 0 цгаадаггүйгээр .
SFX C 0 цгаадаггүйгээ .
SFX C 0 цгаадаггүйг .
SFX C 0 цгаагаагүйтэй .
SFX C 0 цгаагаагүйн .
SFX C 0 цгаагаагүйд .
SFX C 0 цгаагаагүйгээс .
SFX C 0 цгаагаагүйгээр .
SFX C 0 цгаагаагүйгээ .
SFX C 0 цгаагаагүйг .
SFX C 0 цгаалгүй .
SFX C 0 цгаасансан .
SFX C 0 цгаалгүйгээр .
SFX C 0 цгаалгүйгээ .

SFX D Y 27
SFX D 0 сэн .
SFX D 0 дэг .
SFX D 0 лээ .
SFX D 0 сэнд .
SFX D 0 дэгт .
SFX D 0 мээр .
SFX D 0 мэгц .
SFX D 0 сэндээ .
SFX D 0 дэгтээ .
SFX D 0 дэгтэй .
SFX D 0 дэггүй .
SFX D 0 сэнтэй .
SFX D 0 сэнгүй .
SFX D 0 мэгцээ .
SFX D 0 нэ .
SFX D 0 сээр .
SFX D 0 тэл .
SFX D 0 сний .
SFX D 0 снийх .
SFX D 0 снийг .
SFX D 0 тлээ .
SFX D 0 дгээ .
SFX D 0 снээс .
SFX D 0 снээ .
SFX D 0 дгээс .
SFX D 0 дгээр .
SFX D 0 снээр .

SFX E Y 16
SFX E 0 даггүйн .
SFX E 0 даггүйг .
SFX E 0 даггүйд .
SFX E 0 сангүйд .
SFX E 0 сангүйг .
SFX E 0 сангүйн .
SFX E 0 даггүйгээ .
SFX E 0 даггүйгээр .
SFX E 0 даггүйтэй .
SFX E 0 даггүйгээс .
SFX E 0 сангүйгээ .
SFX E 0 сангүйгээр .
SFX E 0 сангүйгээс .
SFX E 0 сангүйтэй .
SFX E 0 саар .
SFX E 0 тал .
SFX F Y 26
SFX F 0 агч .
SFX F 0 ах .
SFX F 0 ахын .
SFX F 0 ахыг .
SFX F 0 ахад .
SFX F 0 ахаа .
SFX F 0 агчид .
SFX F 0 агчаа .
SFX F 0 агчтай .
SFX F 0 агчийн .
SFX F 0 агчийг .
SFX F 0 агчдын .
SFX F 0 агчдыг .
SFX F 0 агчдад .
SFX F 0 агчдаа .
SFX F 0 агчгүй .
SFX F 0 агчаас .
SFX F 0 агчаар .
SFX F 0 ахтай .
SFX F 0 ахдаа .
SFX F 0 ахгүй .
SFX F 0 ахаас .
SFX F 0 ахаар .
SFX F 0 ахынх .
SFX F 0 ахыгаа .
SFX F 0 ахлаар .

SFX G Y 13
SFX G 0 сан .
SFX G 0 лаа .
SFX G 0 дагт .
SFX G 0 санд .
SFX G 0 маар .
SFX G 0 магц .
SFX G 0 дагтай .
SFX G 0 дагтаа .
SFX G 0 даггүй .
SFX G 0 сандаа .
SFX G 0 сантай .
SFX G 0 сангүй .
SFX G 0 магцаа .
SFX H Y 135
SFX H 0 луулъя .
SFX H 0 луултал .
SFX H 0 луулсны .
SFX H 0 луулсан .
SFX H 0 луулна .
SFX H 0 лууллаа .
SFX H 0 луулжээ .
SFX H 0 луулж .
SFX H 0 луулдаг .
SFX H 0 луулбал .
SFX H 0 луулах .
SFX H 0 луулан .
SFX H 0 луулагч .
SFX H 0 луулаг .
SFX H 0 луулавч .
SFX H 0 луулав .
SFX H 0 луулаач .
SFX H 0 луулаад .
SFX H 0 луулаа .
SFX H 0 луул .
SFX H 0 луултлаа .
SFX H 0 луулсных .
SFX H 0 луулсныг .
SFX H 0 луулснаа .
SFX H 0 луулсанд .
SFX H 0 луулсаар .
SFX H 0 луулмагц .
SFX H 0 луулмаар .
SFX H 0 луулдгаа .
SFX H 0 луулдагт .
SFX H 0 луулахын .
SFX H 0 луулахыг .
SFX H 0 луулахад .
SFX H 0 луулахаа .
SFX H 0 луулснаас .
SFX H 0 луулснаар .
SFX H 0 луулдгийн .
SFX H 0 луулдгийг .
SFX H 0 луулдгаас .
SFX H 0 луулдгаар .
SFX H 0 луулахынх .
SFX H 0 луулахтай .
SFX H 0 луулахдаа .
SFX H 0 луулахгүй .
SFX H 0 луулахаас .
SFX H 0 луулахаар .
SFX H 0 луулангаа .
SFX H 0 луулагчид .
SFX H 0 луулагчаа .
SFX H 0 луулаасай .
SFX H 0 луулаарай .
SFX H 0 луулаагүй .
SFX H 0 луулсныхаа .
SFX H 0 луулсныгаа .
SFX H 0 луулсантай .
SFX H 0 луулсандаа .
SFX H 0 луулсангүй .
SFX H 0 луулмагцаа .
SFX H 0 луулдгийнх .
SFX H 0 луулдагтай .
SFX H 0 луулдагтаа .
SFX H 0 луулдаггүй .
SFX H 0 луулахыгаа .
SFX H 0 луулахлаар .
SFX H 0 луулангуут .
SFX H 0 луулагчтай .
SFX H 0 луулагчийн .
SFX H 0 луулагчийг .
SFX H 0 луулагчдын .
SFX H 0 луулагчдыг .
SFX H 0 луулагчдад .
SFX H 0 луулагчдаа .
SFX H 0 луулагчгүй .
SFX H 0 луулагчаас .
SFX H 0 луулагчаар .
SFX H 0 луулснаасаа .
SFX H 0 луулснаараа .
SFX H 0 луулсантайгаа .
SFX H 0 луулмааргүй .
SFX H 0 луулдгийнхаа .
SFX H 0 луулдгийгаа .
SFX H 0 луулдгаасаа .
SFX H 0 луулдгаараа .
SFX H 0 луулдагтайгаа .
SFX H 0 луулахынхаа .
SFX H 0 луулахтайгаа .
SFX H 0 луулахлаараа .
SFX H 0 луулахаасаа .
SFX H 0 луулахаараа .
SFX H 0 луулангуутаа .
SFX H 0 луулагчтайгаа .
SFX H 0 луулагчийнхаа .
SFX H 0 луулагчийнх .
SFX H 0 луулагчийгаа .
SFX H 0 луулагчидтайгаа .
SFX H 0 луулагчидтай .
SFX H 0 луулагчидгүй .
SFX H 0 луулагчдынхаа .
SFX H 0 луулагчдынх .
SFX H 0 луулагчдыгаа .
SFX H 0 луулагчдадаа .
SFX H 0 луулагчдаасаа .
SFX H 0 луулагчдаас .
SFX H 0 луулагчдаараа .
SFX H 0 луулагчдаар .
SFX H 0 луулагчаасаа .
SFX H 0 луулагчаараа .
SFX H 0 луулахгүйн .
SFX H 0 луулаагүйн .
SFX H 0 луулаагүйд .
SFX H 0 луулахгүйд .
SFX H 0 луулахгүйг .
SFX H 0 луулаагүйг .
SFX H 0 луулсангүйн .
SFX H 0 луулсангүйд .
SFX H 0 луулсангүйгээ .
SFX H 0 луулсангүйг .
SFX H 0 луулдаггүйн .
SFX H 0 луулдаггүйд .
SFX H 0 луулдаггүйгээ .
SFX H 0 луулдаггүйг .
SFX H 0 луулахгүйгээс .
SFX H 0 луулахгүйгээр .
SFX H 0 луулахгүйгээ .
SFX H 0 луулаагүйтэй .
SFX H 0 луулаагүйгээс .
SFX H 0 луулаагүйгээр .
SFX H 0 луулаагүйгээ .
SFX H 0 луулсангүйтэй .
SFX H 0 луулсангүйгээс .
SFX H 0 луулсангүйгээр .
SFX H 0 луулдаггүйтэй .
SFX H 0 луулдаггүйгээс .
SFX H 0 луулдаггүйгээр .
SFX H 0 луулахгүйтэй .

SFX I Y 10
SFX I 0 чих .
SFX I 0 чихгүй .
SFX I 0 чихжээ .
SFX I 0 чихгүйн .
SFX I 0 чихгүйд .
SFX I 0 чихгүйг .
SFX I 0 чихгүйтэй .
SFX I 0 чихгүйгээ .
SFX I 0 чихгүйгээс .
SFX I 0 чихгүйгээр .
SFX J Y 21
SFX J 0 агчийнх .
SFX J 0 агчдынх .
SFX J 0 агчдаас .
SFX J 0 агчдаар .
SFX J 0 ахынхаа .
SFX J 0 ахаасаа .
SFX J 0 ахаараа .
SFX J 0 агчийгаа .
SFX J 0 агчидтай .
SFX J 0 агчидгүй .
SFX J 0 агчдыгаа .
SFX J 0 агчдадаа .
SFX J 0 агчаасаа .
SFX J 0 агчаараа .
SFX J 0 агчтайгаа .
SFX J 0 агчийнхаа .
SFX J 0 агчдынхаа .
SFX J 0 агчдаасаа .
SFX J 0 агчдаараа .
SFX J 0 ахтайгаа .
SFX J 0 ахлаараа .

SFX K Y 5
SFX K 0 гүй .
SFX K 0 гүйг .
SFX K 0 гүйгээ .
SFX K 0 гүйгээр .
SFX K 0 гүйгээс .
SFX L Y 14
SFX L 0 дэг .
SFX L 0 сэнд .
SFX L 0 дэгт .
SFX L 0 мээр .
SFX L 0 мэгц .
SFX L 0 сэндээ .
SFX L 0 дэгтээ .
SFX L 0 дэгтэй .
SFX L 0 дэггүй .
SFX L 0 сэнтэй .
SFX L 0 сэнгүй .
SFX L 0 мэгцээ .
SFX L 0 сээр .
SFX L 0 тэл .
